test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-cohhoom_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - čohhoom: # 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: čoḥomân
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: čoḥomist
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: čoḥomáin
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: čoḥomin
    čohhoom+N+Par: čoḥomid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: čoḥomeh
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: čoḥomij
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: čoḥomijd
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: čoḥomáid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: čoḥomijn
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: čoḥomijguin
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: čoḥomijttáá
